Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 202B Admission of an Individual with an Intellectual Disability
202B.250.
Review hearing — Procedures — Disposition — Requested hearing by resident or certain persons.

No less than once in every five (5) years following the initial order for involuntary admission of a resident to an ICF/ID, or an order authorizing continued care and treatment following review pursuant to this section, the court shall hold a hearing to review the status of the resident and necessity for continued care and treatment in the ICF/ID. Notice at least twenty (20) days in advance of the hearing shall be provided by the court to the ICF/ID, county attorney, guardian or limited guardian of the resident, if any, or, if none, an immediate family member as listed on the last interdisciplinary report filed by the ICF/ID. The court shall appoint an attorney to represent the resident at the review hearing.

The review hearing may be informal and held in open court, in chambers, or at the ICF/ID. The hearing shall be held without a jury and the resident shall be entitled to present documentary evidence and witnesses and cross-examine witnesses against the resident.

At the conclusion of the review hearing, the court shall make written findings of fact concerning whether the criteria for involuntary admission set forth in KRS 202B.040 continue to be satisfied based upon clear and convincing evidence. If the court finds that the involuntary admission criteria continue to be satisfied, the court shall enter an order authorizing the continued care and treatment of the resident at the ICF/ID and shall establish the period within which the next review shall be held. Otherwise, the court shall enter an order requiring the resident to be discharged from the ICF/ID.

If at any point during the resident’s placement at an ICF/ID it appears that the resident no longer meets the criteria for involuntary admission set forth in KRS 202B.040, the resident, the resident’s parent, guardian or limited guardian, immediate family member, or attorney may request a review pursuant to this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 147, § 24, effective July 13, 1990; 2012, ch. 146, § 57, effective July 12, 2012.

202B.260.
Petition for writ of habeas corpus.

At any time, and without notice, a person detained at a facility, or a relative, friend, guardian, representative, or attorney on behalf of such person, may petition for a writ of habeas corpus to question the cause and legality of the detention and request that the Circuit Court issue a writ for release.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 147, § 25, effective July 13, 1990.

202B.270.
Convalescent leave status.

A physician may release a resident on convalescent leave status when the interdisciplinary team concludes that the resident would not present a danger or a threat of danger to self, family, or others if provided with continued medical supervision in a less restrictive alternative mode of treatment. Release on convalescent leave status does not terminate a court admission order and shall include provisions for the development of a treatment plan jointly by the ICF/ID and by a provider of outpatient care for follow-up care by the provider and for the continual monitoring of that resident’s condition by the provider.

The ICF/ID from which the resident is given convalescent leave status may at any time readmit the resident without additional court proceedings. If there is reason to believe that it is in the best interest of the resident to be readmitted, the secretary or an authorized staff physician of the ICF/ID may issue an order for the immediate readmission of the resident. The order, if not voluntarily complied with, shall, upon the endorsement by a judge of any court of the county in which the resident resides or is present, authorize any peace officer to take the resident into custody and transport the person to the responsible ICF/ID. Notice of readmission under this section shall be given to the originating court as soon as practicable and simultaneously with the order directing the readmission if possible.

Release on convalescent leave status shall not apply to persons held under admission orders arising out of KRS Chapter 504 unless consent of the appropriate court is obtained.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 147, § 26, effective July 13, 1990; 2012, ch. 146, § 58, effective July 12, 2012.

202B.280.
Peace officer authorized to take absent resident into custody and return
resident to ICF/ID.

If a resident undergoing involuntary treatment on an inpatient basis is absent from the ICF/ID without or in excess of authorization from the ICF/ID staff, the person in charge or that person’s designee may notify the appropriate sheriff or other peace officers who shall take the resident into custody and return the resident to the ICF/ID.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 147, § 27, effective July 13, 1990; 2012, ch. 146, § 59, effective July 12, 2012.

202B.290.
Respite care.

Upon recommendation or approval of the interdisciplinary team of an ICF/ID, a physician may admit for respite care an individual with an intellectual disability. Respite care provided to any individual with an intellectual disability under this section shall not exceed a total of thirty (30) days in any calendar year.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 147, § 28, effective July 13, 1990; 2012, ch. 146, § 60, effective July 12, 2012.

202B.300.
Return of Kentucky residents from other states — Determination of need for further admission.

Legal residents of the state who have become public charges in other states and have been returned to Kentucky because they have been involuntarily admitted may be immediately admitted to an ICF/ID at the request of the secretary or the secretary’s designated representative.

Within seventy-two (72) hours, excluding weekends and holidays, of the admission date, the staff of the ICF/ID shall determine the need of the person for further admission. If two (2) qualified professionals in the area of intellectual disabilities, at least one (1) of whom is a physician, conclude that the person shall be involuntarily admitted, they shall file in the appropriate court a certification requesting involuntary admission procedures be initiated under the provisions of this chapter, unless the person has agreed to remain voluntarily and possesses the mental capacity to give informed consent for voluntary admission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 147, § 31, effective July 13, 1990; 2012, ch. 146, § 61, effective July 12, 2012.

202B.990.
Penalties.

The unwarranted admission of any person under the provisions of this chapter; or

The denial of any person of any of the rights accorded to him under the provisions of this chapter shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment for a term not to exceed five (5) years or both.

Any person who violates the confidentiality of any mental health record under the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 328, § 9; 1990, ch. 147, § 34, effective July 13, 1990.